Missouri, session 2026, SB1621.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 537.1600, to read as
follows:
537.1600. 1. No standalone cause of action for
medical monitoring exists under the laws of this state.
Increased risk of disease, whether accompanied by
physiological or other changes in the human body, is not
itself compensable through damages or any other form of
relief, regardless of the legal theory being asserted.
2. In any civil action, no defendant shall be required
to pay damages or provide any other type of legal,
injunctive, or equitable relief for a plaintiff's future
medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring
procedures unless the plaintiff proves, in addition to the
other requirements for the underlying cause of action, that:
(1) The future medical surveillance, screening tests,
or monitoring procedures sought are directly related to, and
necessitated by, a presently existing and diagnosable
physical disease or injury of the plaintiff;

SB 1621 2
(2) The future medical surveillance, screening tests,
or monitoring procedures are distinct from the medical
surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures
recommended in the absence of the preexisting physical
disease or injury and related exposure; and
(3) The plaintiff's presently existing physical
disease or injury was caused by the defendant's tortious
conduct.
3. For purposes of subsection 2 of this section, the
mere presence of a toxic substance in the bloodstream shall
not constitute a presently existing and diagnosable physical
disease or injury.
✓